Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.067

Wine grape industry, instruction relating to—Purpose.

Marked increases in state and national consumption make it evident that our developing wine grape industry has a bright future. To help assure its success the legislature concludes that Washington State University should provide a sound research, extension, and resident instruction base for both wine grape production and the processing aspects of the wine industry.

[ 1981 1st ex.s. c 5 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 1st ex.s. c 5: See RCW 66.98.100.

Liquor revolving fund—Distribution—Reserve for administration—Disbursement to universities and department of social and health services: RCW 66.08.180.